Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
CHAPTER 11 Miscellaneous Offenses Concerning Public Officers and Employees

Cross references.

Further provisions regarding criminal penalties for actions constituting abuse of governmental office, §

16-10-1

et seq.

Penalty for failure of public officer to carry out duty conferred by election laws, §

21-2-596

.

45-11-1.
Offenses involving public records, documents, and other items.

If any public officer or other person shall steal, embezzle, alter, corrupt, withdraw, falsify, or avoid any record, process, charter, gift, grant, conveyance, or contract; or shall knowingly and willfully take off, discharge, or conceal any issue, forfeited recognizance, or other forfeiture; or shall forge, deface, or falsify any document or instrument recorded or any registry, acknowledgment, or certificate; or shall alter, deface, or falsify any minutes, document, book, or any proceeding whatever of or belonging to any public office within this state; or if any person shall cause or procure any of these offenses to be committed, or to be in any manner concerned therein, he shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment and labor in the penitentiary for not less than two years nor more than ten years.

Whosoever, without authority and with the intention of converting to his own or another’s use, willfully conceals any record, book, or document while on the premises of any public office or willfully removes any book, document, record, or other property from any such office shall be guilty of stealing such property. Proof of the concealment of such record or other office property while still on the premises shall be prima-facie evidence of intent to steal.

A public officer or employee may detain and question any person whose conduct causes reasonable ground for suspicion that such person is engaging in stealing or criminal damage to the records in a public office.

A public officer or employee causing the arrest or detention of any person pursuant to this Code section shall not be held civilly liable for slander, malicious prosecution, false imprisonment, malicious arrest, assault and battery of the person, physical injuries and mental suffering, or any other suit for damages arising from such arrest, whether such arrest takes place on the public property or after close pursuit from such premises by such officer; provided, however, that, in causing the arrest of such person, the officer or employee had probable cause at the time of such arrest to believe that the person was committing unlawful acts relating to public documents and the arrest and detention were under reasonable circumstances.

Upon presentation of affirmative proof, the Secretary of State or his or her designee or, with respect to the Georgia Archives, the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia may initiate action through the Attorney General or other appropriate jurisdiction to prevent the sale, transfer, conveyance, destruction, or alienation of any records, books, documents, or other office property which has been unlawfully removed from any public office or public officer or employee. Upon request of the Secretary of State or his or her designee or the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia, the Attorney General or other appropriate jurisdiction shall have the authority to enjoin, recover, and replevin such records, books, documents, or other office property.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Records, books, documents, or other office property” means, but is not limited to, all books, plates, pictures, photographs, films, engravings, paintings, drawings, maps, newspapers, magazines, pamphlets, broadsides, personal papers, organization records, documents, letters, public records, microforms, sound recordings, audiovisual materials in any format, magnetic or other tapes, electronic data processing records, artifacts, or other documentary, written, or printed material, regardless of physical form or characteristics, belonging to, on loan to, or otherwise in the custody of any public office;

“Public office” means any office held, used, or controlled for public purposes by any department, agency, board, or branch of state, county, or municipal government without reference to the ownership of the building or of the realty on which it is situated. Such term includes any archives, library, or records storage area maintained by such governments;

“Avoid” means to annul, cancel, make void, destroy the efficacy of, or destroy without authority any record, book, document, or other office property;

“Public officer or employee” means any officer or employee having custody of or responsibility for any records, books, documents, or other office property referred to in this Code section.

History.

Laws 1833, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 805; Code 1863, § 4366; Code 1868, § 4404; Code 1873, § 4471; Code 1882, § 4471; Penal Code 1895, § 280; Penal Code 1910, § 284; Code 1933, § 89-9903; Ga. L. 1977, p. 568, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 591, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 594, § 2-2/HB 287.

45-11-2.
Selling office or dividing fees.

If any person who has been elected to any office shall sell or farm out said office; or if any person shall purchase or agree to give any money or other thing of value to a person elected for the privilege of exercising the duties of said office; or if any person shall promise or agree to divide the profits, fees, or emoluments of said office with the person so elected, he shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by confinement and labor in the penitentiary for not less than one year nor more than three years.

History.

Ga. L. 1871-72, p. 285, §§ 1, 2; Code 1873, § 4472; Code 1882, § 4472; Penal Code 1895, § 281; Penal Code 1910, § 285; Code 1933, § 89-9904.

Cross references.

Buying or selling of votes, §

21-2-570

.

45-11-3.
Assault under color of office.

Any officer of this state who shall assault or beat any individual under color of his office or commission without a lawful justification to do so shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Laws 1833, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 806; Code 1863, § 4371; Code 1868, § 4409; Code 1873, § 4477; Code 1882, § 4477; Penal Code 1895, § 284; Penal Code 1910, § 288; Code 1933, § 89-9906.

Cross references.

Prohibition of corporal punishment of inmates, §

42-5-58

.

45-11-4.
Unprofessional conduct; misdemeanor; applicability.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“County officer” means any elected county officer, including the judge of the probate court, clerk of the superior court, tax receiver, tax collector, and tax commissioner where such office has replaced the tax receiver and tax collector, and any county commissioner.

“Municipal officer” means any mayor or elected member of any municipal governing authority.

“Public officer” means a county officer, a municipal officer, and state officials as provided in Code Section 45-15-11.

A public officer may be charged under this Code section for:

Malpractice, misfeasance, or malfeasance in office;

Using oppression or tyrannical partiality in the administration or under the color of his or her office;

When required by law, willfully refusing or failing to preside in or hold his or her court at the regular terms thereof, or when it is his or her duty under the law to do so;

Using any other deliberate means to delay or avoid the due course or proceeding of law; or

Willfully and knowingly demanding more cost than he or she is entitled to by law in the administration and under color of his or her office.

A conviction for violating subsection (b) of this Code section shall be punished as for a misdemeanor, and upon conviction in a court of competent jurisdiction, the accused shall be removed from office.

This Code section shall only apply to a public officer charged under subsection (b) of this Code section. This Code section shall not apply when a public officer is charged with any other crime alleged to have occurred while such official was in the performance of an official duty.

This Code section shall only apply to a public officer holding office at the time of indictment and not to former office holders.

History.

Laws 1833, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, pp. 644, 809; Code 1863, § 4391; Ga. L. 1865-66, p. 233, § 1; Code 1868, § 4432; Ga. L. 1873, p. 23, § 1; Code 1873, § 4504; Code 1882, § 4504; Ga. L. 1895, p. 63, § 1; Penal Code 1895, §§ 291, 292; Penal Code 1910, §§ 295, 296; Code 1933, §§ 89-9907, 89-9908; Ga. L. 1967, p. 858, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1325, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 884, § 3-33; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 45; Ga. L. 1988, p. 298, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1969, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 487, § 3; Ga. L. 2011, p. 59, § 1-67/HB 415; Ga. L. 2014, p. 866, § 45/SB 340; Ga. L. 2016, p. 186, § 8/HB 941.

The 2014 amendment,

effective April 29, 2014, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “means” for “shall mean” in paragraphs (a)(1), (a)(2), and (a)(3).

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “misdemeanor, and upon” for “misdemeanor and, upon” in subsection (c); deleted former subsection (f), which read: “Any indictment brought pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section shall specially set forth the merits of the complaint against the accused public officer. A copy of the proposed bill of indictment shall be served on the accused public officer at least 15 days before it is presented to the grand jury.”; deleted former subsection (g), which read: “The accused shall have the right to appear before the grand jury to make such sworn statement as he or she shall desire at the conclusion of the presentation of the state’s evidence. The accused shall not be subject to examination, either direct or cross, and shall not have the right individually or through his or her counsel to examine the state’s witnesses. The accused and his or her counsel shall have the right to be present during the presentation of all evidence and alleged statements of the accused on the proposed indictment, presentment, or accusation, after which the accused and his or her counsel shall retire instanter from the grand jury room to permit the grand jury to deliberate upon the indictment.”; deleted former subsection (h), which read: “At any time during the presentation of evidence or during deliberations, the grand jury may amend the indictment or instruct the district attorney to cause a new indictment to be drawn as in any other case. In such case, a copy of the amendment or new indictment, if it relates to the accused public official, shall be provided to the accused public official and his or her counsel.”; and deleted former subsection (i), which read: “If a true bill is returned by the grand jury, the indictment shall, as in other cases, be published in open court and shall be placed on the superior court criminal docket of cases to be tried by a trial jury.”

History of Code section.

This Code section is partially derived from the decision in
Kent v. State,

18 Ga. App. 30

,

88 S.E. 913

(1916).

Cross references.

Indictment of peace officer for crime in performance of duties, §

17-7-52

.

Affording of rights provided by section to state official charged by indictment with misfeasance or malfeasance in office, §

45-15-11

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2001, p. 487, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Corruption Prevention Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2001, p. 487, § 6, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the provisions of Sections 3 and 4 of the Act shall apply to crimes committed before, on, and after April 20, 2001.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 59, § 1-1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Jury Composition Reform Act of 2011.’ ”

Law reviews.

For article, “Georgia Local Government Officials and the Grand Jury,” see 26 Ga. St. B.J. 50 (1989).

For article, “Local Government Law,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 389 (2001).

For survey article on local government law for the period from June 1, 2002 to May 31, 2003, see 55 Mercer L. Rev. 353 (2003).

For annual survey of local government law, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 289 (2005).

For survey article on local government law, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 285 (2007).

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Georgia St. U. L. Rev. 79 (2016).

45-11-5.
Extortion generally.

As used in this Code section, the term “extortion” means an unlawful taking by a public officer, under color of his office, from any person of any money or thing of value that is not due to him or more than is due to him.

Any public officer who shall by himself, his deputy, his agent, or other person employed by him be guilty of extortion in demanding or receiving other and greater fees than by law are allowed him shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be dismissed from office.

History.

Laws 1833, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 809; Code 1863, §§ 4393, 4394; Code 1868, §§ 4434, 4435; Code 1873, §§ 4507, 4508; Code 1882, §§ 4507, 4508; Penal Code 1895, §§ 298, 299; Penal Code 1910, §§ 302, 303; Code 1933, §§ 89-9909, 89-9910; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45.

45-11-6.
Demanding more than legal fees for advertising.

Any judge of the probate court, sheriff, coroner, clerk, marshal, or other officer who shall receive, collect, or demand other and greater fees for any legal advertising than are provided by law shall be guilty of extortion as defined in Code Section 45-11-5 and shall be punished as provided in that Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 81, § 2; Code 1863, § 3634; Code 1868, § 3659; Code 1882, § 3704b; Penal Code 1895, § 303; Penal Code 1910, § 307; Code 1933, § 89-9911; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45.

Cross references.

Rates for legal advisements, §

9-13-143

.

45-11-7.
Retaining compensation for legal advertisements.

If any officer shall directly or indirectly demand or retain as a commission any part of the compensation allowed by law to publishers for publishing legal advertisements, he shall be guilty of extortion as defined in Code Section 45-11-5 and shall be punished as provided in that Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 81, § 14; Code 1882, § 3704d; Penal Code 1895, § 304; Penal Code 1910, § 308; Code 1933, § 89-9912.

45-11-8.
Engaging in bail bond business.

It shall be unlawful for any elected official, officer of the court, law enforcement officer, or attorney in this state to engage either directly or indirectly in the bail bond business. For purposes of this Code section, “elected official” shall not include a person who is elected to the local school board.

Any person who violates this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 403, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1986, p. 303, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 593, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 437, § 1/HB 980.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2004, “a person who is” was substituted for “persons who are” in the second sentence of subsection (a).

45-11-9.
Discrimination against optometrists or physicians in suggestions for visual care.

It shall be unlawful for any state board, body, agency, or institution or any public official to discriminate against optometrists licensed under Chapter 30 of Title 43 or against physicians licensed under Chapter 34 of Title 43 in the suggestion or recommendation for visual care which is within the scope of the practice licensed by those chapters.

Nothing contained in this Code section shall be construed to prevent a person having custodial care of another person from referring such person to the practitioner of his choice.

Nothing contained in this Code section shall be construed to prevent a physician from referring patients to any practitioner of his choice.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 474, §§ 1-3.

45-11-10.
Coercion of other officer or employee to give anything of value for political purposes.

It shall be unlawful for any officer or employee of this state to coerce or attempt to coerce or command directly or indirectly any other state officer or employee to pay, lend, or contribute any part of his salary or to kick back any sum of money or anything else of value to any party, committee, organization, agency, or person for political purposes.

It shall be unlawful for any officer or employee of any county, municipal corporation, school district, or other political subdivision to coerce or attempt to coerce or command directly or indirectly any other officer or employee of such political subdivision to pay, lend, or contribute any part of his salary or to kick back any sum of money or anything else of value to any party, committee, organization, agency, or person for political purposes.

Any person who violates any provision of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 1035, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 617, § 1.